Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3281.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [144.063] PUBLIC HEALTH SCHOOL HEALTH SERVICES CONSULTANT. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Employment of public health school health services consultant. new text end new text begin The Department of Health must employ a public health school health services consultant to improve health and educational outcomes among children and adolescents in educational settings. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Requirements for position. new text end new text begin The public health school health services consultant employed by the department under subdivision 1 must be a registered nurse who: new text end new text begin (1) is registered as a public health nurse in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (2) is licensed as a school nurse in Minnesota; new text end new text begin (3) has a minimum of three years of experience as a licensed school nurse serving schools; new text end new text begin (4) has demonstrated expertise in public health nursing as it relates to school health for children and adolescents in educational settings; and new text end new text begin (5) possesses comprehensive knowledge of population-based school health issues, access to health services in schools, public health principles, health education, school-based health services, and the relationship between health and educational outcomes. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Duties. new text end new text begin The public health school health services consultant employed by the department under subdivision 1 must: new text end new text begin (1) develop, implement, evaluate, and maintain state and local policies and programs that address the health needs of children and adolescents in educational settings; new text end new text begin (2) support educational institutions in sustaining and advancing professional skills in school health leadership, health communication, and health promotion; new text end new text begin (3) provide technical assistance, guidance, training, and consultation on school health best practices that enhance the health and well-being of children and adolescents in educational settings; new text end new text begin (4) identify, develop, and distribute resources on school health best practices to enhance the capacity and readiness of school nurses and other school health professionals to effectively and safely meet the health needs of children and adolescents in educational settings; new text end new text begin (5) develop and disseminate guidance for school nurses and other school health professionals on the effective implementation of health promotion activities; new text end new text begin (6) expand access to online and asynchronous continuing education and professional development programs for school nurses and other school health professionals, with a focus on best practices that support the health and well-being of children and adolescents in educational settings; new text end new text begin (7) collect school health workforce data to evaluate the effectiveness of health services provided in educational settings; new text end new text begin (8) collaborate with the Department of Education; school-based health centers as defined in section 145.903, subdivision 1; and other state agencies to coordinate health-related services for children and adolescents in educational settings; and new text end new text begin (9) provide the services and supports described in clauses (1) to (8) to public health departments, schools, and national agencies, as necessary, to address the health-related needs of children and adolescents in educational settings. new text end